Arkansas, session 2025, SB478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 38, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 3 - Arkansas Diesel Engine Freedom Act of 2025

27-38-301. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Diesel
Engine Freedom Act of 2025".

27-38-302. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) United States Constitution, Article I, § 8, Clause 3, grants
the United States Congress the power to regulate commerce "among the several
states" but does not grant the United States Congress the power to regulate
intrastate commerce or activities that occur solely within one (1) state;
*ZRC077*
03/17/2025 2:27:34 PM ZRC077

SB478
(2) The mandate of the United States Government requiring the
use of diesel exhaust fluid in diesel engines operating solely within this
state exceeds the powers delegated to the United States Congress under United
States Constitution, Article I, § 8, Clause 3, and is therefore
unconstitutional;
(3) Under the Tenth Amendment to the United States Constitution,
powers that are not delegated to the United States Government nor prohibited
to the states are reserved to the states or to the people, granting this
state the authority to regulate emissions standards for vehicles used solely
within this state; and
(4) It is the duty of this state to protect its citizens from
unconstitutional overreach and burdensome regulations that are outside of the
bounds of the authority of the United States Government.
(b) The General Assembly intends for this subchapter to:
(1) Assert the sovereign right of this state under the Tenth
Amendment to the United States Constitution to regulate emissions standards
for vehicles operating solely within this state when the vehicles are not
engaged in interstate commerce;
(2) Declare that a federal regulation, executive order, or
mandate requiring the use of diesel exhaust fluid in diesel engines operating
solely within this state is null and void as it exceeds the constitutional
authority granted to the United States Congress under United States
Constitution, Article I, § 8, Clause 3; and
(3) Ensure that a state entity shall not enforce or attempt to
enforce a regulation requiring the use of diesel exhaust fluid for vehicles
operating solely within this state.

27-38-303. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Exempt engine" means a diesel engine that:
(A) Is operated solely within this state; and
(B) Does not require the use of diesel exhaust fluid;
(2) "Exempt engine right" means a person's right to manufacture,
produce, sell, install, use, or operate an exempt engine solely within this
state;

03/17/2025 2:27:34 PM ZRC077

SB478
(3) "Federal diesel regulation" means an act, agency directive,
executive order, law, order, rule, regulation, or statute of the United
States Government related to a diesel engine, diesel exhaust fluid, or
federal emissions standards as applied to a diesel engine; and
(4) "State entity" means a state agency, political subdivision
of the state, or a public official or an agent, employee, or representative
of a state agency or political subdivision of the state.

27-38-304. Diesel engine rights.
(a) A federal diesel regulation that infringes on an exempt engine
right or that requires the use of diesel exhaust fluid by an exempt engine is
invalid in this state.
(b) A state entity shall not enforce or attempt to enforce a federal
diesel regulation that infringes on an exempt engine right or that requires
the use of diesel exhaust fluid by an exempt engine within this state.
(c)(1) The manufacture, sale, and installation of an exempt engine is
lawful within this state.
(2) A state entity shall not prohibit or restrict the
production, sale, or use of an exempt engine solely within this state.
(d)(1) An exempt engine that is manufactured and sold exclusively
within this state is not subject to the enforcement of a federal diesel
regulation.
(2) An exempt engine that is manufactured and sold exclusively
within this state shall be clearly labeled for use solely within this state
and may not be exported for use in another state unless the exempt engine is
compliant with applicable federal laws.

27-38-305. Violation of diesel engine rights — Penalties.
(a) A state entity that violates this subchapter is subject to a civil
penalty of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation of this
subchapter.
(b)(1) If a state entity that violates this subchapter is a state
agency or political subdivision of the state, the authority of the state
agency or political subdivision of the state to enforce state laws or
regulations related to vehicle emissions is immediately suspended for a
period of at least twelve (12) months.
03/17/2025 2:27:34 PM ZRC077

SB478
(2) If a state entity that violates this subchapter is a public
official or an agent, employee, or representative of a state agency or
political subdivision of the state, the public official, agent, employee, or
representative shall be terminated from employment with the state agency or
political subdivision of the state and shall be prohibited from holding
public office or obtaining state employment for a period of five (5) years.






























03/17/2025 2:27:34 PM ZRC077